apertium-kjh.kjh.twol
Alphabet

 а б в г ғ д е ё ж з и й і к л м н ң о ӧ п р с т у ӱ ф х ц ч ӌ ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
 А Б В Г Ғ Д Е Ё Ж З И Й І К Л М Н Ң О Ӧ П Р С Т У Ӱ Ф Х Ц Ч Ӌ Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я

 %{L%}:л ! %{L%}:т %{L%}:н
 %{D%}:д ! %{D%}:т
 %{N%}:н ! %{N%}:т
 %{S%}:с ! %{S%}:з
 %{G%}:г ! %{G%}:х %{G%}:ғ %{G%}:0 
 %{J%}:ӌ ! %{J%}:ч

 %{A%}:а ! %{A%}:е
 %{I%}:ы ! %{I%}:и %{I%}:і

 %{s%}:0 %{s%}:з 
 %{n%}:0 %{n%}:н 
 %{y%}:0 %{y%}:ы %{y%}:и 

 %{☭%}:0
 %>:0 

 ;

Sets

Vow = а э и о у 
      я е ы ё ю 
          і ӧ ӱ ;

RealCns = б г ғ д ж з к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ӌ ш щ й
          Б Г Ғ Д Ж З К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ӌ Ш Щ й ; 

Cns = б г ғ д ж з к л м н ң п р с т ф х ц ч ӌ ш щ й
      Б Г Ғ Д Ж З К Л М Н Ң П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ӌ Ш Щ й
      %{L%} %{D%} %{N%} %{S%} %{J%} %{s%} %{n%} ; 

VoicelessCns = к т п с х ч ш ; 

VoicelessCnsRus = б в д ж г ;

VcdDorsalCns = г ғ ң
               Г Ғ Ң ;

VcdCns = р л м н ң г ғ
         Р Л М Н Ң Г Ғ ;

Nasal = м н ң
        М Н Ң ;

BackVow = а о ы у я ё ю
          А О Ы У Я Ё Ю ;

FrontVow = і ӱ е э ӧ
           І Ӱ Е Э Ӧ ;

RealVow = і и ӱ е э ӧ а о ы у 
          І И Ӱ Е Э Ӧ А О Ы У ;


Rules 

!!! FIXME !!! 

!"Deletion of {s} before consonant"
!%{s%}:0 <=> :RealCns %>: _ ;

!"Insertion of {s} before vowel"
!%{s%}:з <=> :Vow %>: _ ;

"Deletion of {n} in possessive"
%{n%}:0 <=> _ .#. ; 

!@ а т >:0 {L}:т {A}:а р >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0 


!!!== Lenition ==!!!

"Intervocalic voicing at a morpheme boundary"
Cx:Cy <=> :Vow/:0 _ %>: :Vow/:0 ;
      where Cx in ( п т с ш )
            Cy in ( б д з ж )
      matched ;


!!!== Morphological stuff ==!!!

"Insertion of {n} before vowel"
%{n%}:н <=> _ %>: [ :Vow | %{D%}: | %{N%}: | %{S%}: ] ;

!@ х ы р и >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ы {n}:н >:0 {D}:д {A}:а

!@ г и м н а з и я {☭}:0 >:0 {s}:з {I}:ы {n}:н >:0 {S}:з {A}:а р

"Deletion of accusative {N} after {n}"
%{N%}:0 <=> %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;
!@ а т >:0 {L}:т {A}:а р >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0 >:0 {N}:0 {I}:ы

"Deletion of dative {G} after possessive"
%{G%}:0 <=> %{I%}: %{n%}: %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ;
        except 
              [ :Vow - :ӧ ]/:0 _ ; 

!!!== Progressive assimilation ==!!!

"Assimilation after voiceless consonants"
Cx:Cy <=> :VoicelessCns/[:0 | ь ] _ ;
          [ :VoicelessCnsRus %{☭%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ] _ ;
      except
          %{n%}: %>: _ %{I%}: .#. ;
      where Cx in ( %{D%} %{J%} %{L%} %{N%} %{B%} )
            Cy in (   т     ч     т     т     п   )
      matched ;

!@ К а т а н о в {☭}:0 >:0 {N}:т {I}:ы ң

!@ о б л а с т ь {☭}:0 >:0 {D}:т {A}:а

!@ А л т а й >:0 {D}:д {A}:а

"Voicing of {S}"
%{S%}:з <=> [ :VcdCns | :Vow | й ]/:0 _ ;

!@ г и м н а з и я {☭}:0 >:0 {s}:з {I}:ы {n}:н >:0 {S}:з {A}:а р

"Front devoicing of {G}"
%{G%}:к <=> [ :FrontVow :RealCns* :VoicelessCns ]/:0 _ ;
            [ :FrontVow :RealCns* :VoicelessCnsRus %{☭%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ] _ ;
 

"Back devoicing of {G}"
%{G%}:х <=> [ :BackVow :RealCns* :VoicelessCns ]/:0 _ ;
            [ :BackVow :RealCns* :VoicelessCnsRus %{☭%}:0 ]/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ] _ ;

"Back voicing of {G}"
%{G%}:ғ <=> [ :BackVow :RealCns* [ :VcdCns - :VcdDorsalCns ] ]/:0 _ ;
            [ :Vow :BackVow ]/:0 _ ;
            %>: :Cns :BackVow _ :BackVow  ; ! -DAGI = -дағы
        except
            %{I%}: %{n%}: %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ; ! avoid confliect with px*.sg.dat
            [ :Vow - :ӧ ]/:0 _ ; 


!!!== Deletion ==!!!

"Deletion of {G}"
%{G%}:0 <=> :VcdDorsalCns/[ :0 - %{☭%}: ] _ ;  ! after voiced dorsal consonants
        except 
            %{I%}: %{n%}: %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ; ! avoid confliect with px*.sg.dat
                          %>: %{D%}: %{A%}: _ %{I%}:  ; ! avoid conflict with loc.attr

"Deletion of {G} after short vowels except ӧ"
%{G%}:0 <=> [ :Vow - :ӧ ]/:0 _ ;
        except 
            [ :Vow :Vow ]/:0 _ ;
            %{I%}: %{n%}: %>: _ %{A%}: .#. ; ! avoid confliect with px*.sg.dat
                          %>: %{D%}: %{A%}: _ %{I%}:  ; ! avoid conflict with loc.attr

!@ а м н и с т и я {☭}:0 >:0 {G}:0 {A}:а

!FIXME: this currently breaks stuff, but I don't see another straightforward way to do this
!"Short vowel to а/е before {G}{A}"
!Vx:Vy <=> _ %>: %{G%}:0 %{A%}: ;
!      except 
!          [ :Vow :Vow ]/:0 _ ;
!          :ӧ/:0 _ ;
!      where Vx in ( і ӱ и е э ӧ а о ы у я ё ю )
!            Vy in ( е е е е е е а а а а а а а )
!      matched ;
"Short vowel except ӧ to а/е before {G}{A}"
Vx:Vy <=> _ [ %>: %{G%}:0 %{A%}: ]/:0 ;
      except 
          :Vow/:0 _ ;
      where Vx in ( і ӱ и о ы у ю ) ! Check и
            Vy in ( е е а а а а я )
      matched ;

"Delete {S} when too many ‹с›s" ! FIXME: probably other stuff too, like стс?
%{S%}:0 <=> [ :с :с ]/:0 _ ;

!!!== Vowel harmony ==!!!

"Vowel harmony for {A}"
%{A%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :RealCns* :RealCns ]/[:0* | ь ] _ ;
             Vx: [ %>: %{G%}:0 ]/:0* _ ; ! for dative case where {G} deletes
         where Vx in ( і ӱ и е э ӧ а о ы у я ё ю ) ! Check и	
               Vy in ( е е е е е е а а а а а а а )
         matched ;

"Vowel harmony for {I}"
%{I%}:Vy <=> :Vx [ :RealCns* :RealCns ]/:0* _ ;
             :Vx Cns:*/:0* _ ; 
         where Vx in ( і ӱ и е э ӧ а о ы у я ё ю ) ! Check и
               Vy in ( і і ы і і і ы ы ы ы ы ы ы )
         matched ;

!@ х ы р и >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ы {n}:н >:0 {D}:д {A}:а

!!!== Consonant harmony ==!!!

"{D} nasal harmony"
%{D%}:н <=> :Nasal/:0 _ [ :Vow :Nasal ]/:0 ;


!@ а т >:0 {L}:т {A}:а р >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0 >:0 {N}:н {I}:ы ң

!@ а т >:0 {L}:т {A}:а р >:0 {s}:0 {I}:ы {n}:0 >:0 {G}:0 {A}:а
